Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.060

Effect of death, removal, or resignation of guardian or conservator.

(1) Appointment of a guardian or conservator terminates on the death or removal of the guardian or conservator, or when the court under subsection (2) of this section approves a resignation of the guardian or conservator.

(2) A guardian or conservator must petition the court to resign. The petition may include a request that the court appoint a successor. Resignation of a guardian or conservator is effective on the date the resignation is approved by the court.

(3) Death, removal, or resignation of a guardian or conservator does not affect liability for a previous act or the obligation to account for:

(a) An action taken on behalf of the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship; or

(b) The individual's funds or other property.

[ 2019 c 437 s 112.]